California, session 20252026, AB1771.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. The Legislature finds and declares all of the following:(a) Section 42 of Title 25 of the California Code of Regulations, adopted by the Department of Housing and Community Development, provides that certain residential properties and hotels must have a caretaker that resides on the premises.(b) The Department of Housing and Community Development plays a critical role in ensuring the health and safety of all Californians in their homes. It also plays a critical role in advancing the state’s goals of ensuring housing is safe and habitable, preserving existing rental housing, and increasing the supply of newly constructed housing affordable to all households.(c) It is a goal of the Legislature to ensure that adopted statutes and regulations continue to meet the needs of all Californians and help advance the state’s housing goals.SECTION 1.SEC. 2. Section 17921.2 is added to the Health and Safety Code, to read:17921.2.(a)A state or local entity shall not require a manager or other caretaker to reside upon the premises of an apartment house.(b)The department shall update its regulations as may be necessary to comply with this section.(c)The Legislature finds and declares that this section addresses a matter of statewide concern rather than a municipal affair as that term is used in Section 5 of Article XI of the California Constitution. Therefore, this section applies to all cities, including charter cities.17921.2. (a) No later than January 1, 2029, the department shall develop and submit to the Legislature a report that analyzes the efficacy of Section 42 of Title 25 of the California Code of Regulations and provide recommendations on whether to maintain, modify, or repeal the regulation. The analysis and recommendations shall consider all of the following factors:(1) The extent to which the regulation advances each of the following goals:(A) Ensuring renters live in safe, accessible, and habitable housing.(B) Ensuring renters are able to make timely rental payments.(C) Ensuring compliance with state and local laws, including those governing habitability of structures, provision and maintenance of common area lighting and security, fire safety, and similar laws.(2) The extent to which the repeal of the regulation would impact both of the following:(A) Disaster and emergency preparedness and response.(B) The housing stability and employment status of current resident managers.(3) The anticipated fiscal impacts of repealing the regulation on state and local governments, including increased costs associated with code enforcement, habitability compliance, or tenant protections.(4) Input from stakeholders gathered pursuant to subdivision (b).(b) In developing the report specified in subdivision (a), the department shall engage and solicit feedback from stakeholders regarding the continued efficacy of Section 42 of Title 25 of the California Code of Regulations. Stakeholders shall include, but not be limited to, all of the following:(1) Residents of rental housing.(2) Owners of rental housing.(3) Organizations representing the interests of renters.(4) Organizations representing the interests of owners or managers of rental housing.(5) Local governments.(c) (1) A report to be submitted pursuant to subdivision (a) shall be submitted in compliance with Section 9795 of the Government Code.(2) Pursuant to Section 10231.5 of the Government Code, this section is repealed on January 1, 2031.